Washington statutes.
RCW 43.23.340

Agricultural pest and disease response account.

(1) The agricultural pest and disease response account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from moneys appropriated to the account by the legislature or moneys directed to the account from any other lawful source, for the purpose of funding emerging agricultural pest and disease response activities, must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

(2) Following a declaration of emergency under RCW 17.24.171 or issuance of a quarantine order under RCW 16.36.010 or 17.24.041, expenditures from the account may be used only for activities necessary to respond to emerging agricultural pest and disease threats in order to protect the food and agricultural economy of the state, the public health of the state, or the environment of the state including, but not limited to, actions authorized under this chapter and chapters 15.08, 16.36, 16.38, and 17.24 RCW.

(3) By October 1st following any fiscal year in which expenditures were made from the account, the department must provide the director of the office of financial management with a close-out cost summary of expenditures authorized for that fiscal year.

[ 2024 c 228 s 2.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2024 c 228: "(1) The legislature finds that Washington agriculture is complex and highly diverse, producing more than 300 agricultural commodities on over 35,900 farms. Agricultural production in Washington is highly valued, generating $12,800,000,000 per year in production value, not including over $17,000,000,000 in food and agricultural products that pass through Washington's ports annually.

(2) The legislature also finds that the Washington state department of agriculture's statutory duties include monitoring and responding to new, emerging, and transboundary plant and animal pests and diseases. Pest and disease challenges, to the state's food systems, public health, and the environment, have increased in frequency and severity due to changing climate patterns and global trade flows.

(3) In order to better protect Washington's food and agricultural economy, public health, and the environment, the legislature intends to provide more reliable and readily available funding to prevent, quickly detect, and rapidly respond to emerging threats from agricultural pests and diseases." [ 2024 c 228 s 1.]